vi: Chức năng công tắc đèn: Đèn phụ trợ/đèn địa hình; Đèn phanh (thủ công/độ thêm); Đèn chào mừng / đèn soi vũng nước; Đèn ốp trần / đèn nội thất; Đèn lái; Đèn sương mù; Cảnh báo nguy hiểm; Đèn pha; Đèn pha / chỉnh độ sáng; Đèn chiếu sáng cụm đồng hồ / bảng táp-lô; Thanh đèn; Đèn đỗ xe/đèn chạy ban ngày; Đèn lùi; Đèn xi nhan; Đèn làm việc; Khác
th: หน้าที่ของสวิตช์ไฟ: ไฟเสริม/ไฟออฟโรด; ไฟเบรก (แมนนวล/อะไหล่แต่ง); ไฟส่องสว่างต้อนรับ/ไฟส่องพื้น; ไฟเพดาน/ไฟในเก๋ง; ไฟส่องสว่างขณะขับขี่; ไฟตัดหมอก; ไฟฉุกเฉิน; ไฟหน้า; ไฟสูง/ไฟหรี่; ไฟหน้าปัด/ไฟคอนโซล; ไลท์บาร์; ไฟจอด/ไฟเดย์ไลท์; ไฟถอย/ไฟถอยหลัง; ไฟเลี้ยว; ไฟส่องสว่างการทำงาน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Funkcija stikala za luč: Pomožna/terenska luč; Zavorna luč (ročna/naknadno vgrajena); Osvetlitev pri vstopanju; Stropna / notranja luč; Vozna luč; Meglenka; Varnostne utripalke; Žaromet; Dolga luč / zatemnilnik; Osvetlitev instrumentov / armaturne plošče; Svetlobna letev; Parkirne/dnevne luči; Luč za vzvratno vožnjo; Smernik; Delovna luč; Drugo
de: Funktion des Lichtschalters: Zusatz-/Offroad-Scheinwerfer; Bremslicht (manuell/Nachrüstung); Einstiegs-/Umfeldbeleuchtung; Innenraumbeleuchtung; Fahrlicht; Nebelscheinwerfer; Warnblinklicht; Scheinwerfer; Fernlicht / Abblendschalter; Instrumenten-/Armaturenbrettbeleuchtung; Lichtleiste; Stand-/Tagfahrlicht; Rückfahrlicht; Blinker; Arbeitsscheinwerfer; Sonstige
pt-BR: Interruptor de luz função: Luz auxiliar/off-road; Luz de freio (manual/acessória); Luz de cortesia / luz de poça; Luz de teto / luz interna; Farol de rodagem; Farol de neblina; Pisca-alerta; Farol; Farol alto / dimmer; Iluminação de instrumentos / painel; Barra de luz; Luzes de estacionamento/rodagem; Luz de ré; Seta; Luz de trabalho; Outro
fr: Fonction de l’interrupteur d’éclairage: Phare auxiliaire/hors route; Feu stop (manuel/deuxième monte); Éclairage d’accueil / de seuil; Plafonnier / éclairage intérieur; Phare de conduite; Feu antibrouillard; Feux de détresse; Phare; Feux de route / commutateur; Éclairage des instruments / du tableau de bord; Barre lumineuse; Feux de stationnement/de position; Feu de recul; Clignotant; Phare de travail; Autre
pl: Functionsprzełącznika światła: Światło pomocnicze/terenowe; Światło hamowania (ręczne/akcesoryjne); Oświetlenie powitalne / podłoża; Oświetlenie podsufitki / wnętrza; Światła do jazdy; Światło przeciwmgielne; Światła awaryjne; Reflektor; Światło drogowe / ściemniacz; Oświetlenie wskaźników / deski rozdzielczej; Pasek LED (light bar); Światła postojowe/pozycyjne; Światło cofania; Kierunkowskaz; Światło robocze; Inne
ro-RO: Funcția întrerupătorului de lumină: Lumină auxiliară/off-road; Lumină de frână (manual/aftermarket); Lumină de curtoazie/puddle; Plafonieră / lumină de interior; Lumină de drum; Proiector de ceață; Avarie; Far; Fază lungă / comutator; Iluminare instrumente / bord; Bară de lumini; Lumini de parcare/poziție; Lumină de marșarier; Semnalizator; Lumină de lucru; Altele
en: Light switch function: Auxiliary/off-road light; Brake light (manual/aftermarket); Courtesy / puddle light; Dome / interior light; Driving light; Fog light; Hazard warning; Headlight; High beam / dimmer; Instrument / dash illumination; Light bar; Parking/running lights; Reverse / backup light; Turn signal; Work light; Other
el: Λειτουργία διακόπτη φωτισμού: Βοηθητικό/off-road φως; Φως φρένου (χειροκίνητο/aftermarket); Φως υποδοχής / εδάφους; Φως πλαφονιέρας / εσωτερικού χώρου; Φως πορείας; Προβολέας ομίχλης; Αλάρμ; Μπροστινό φανάρι; Μεγάλη σκάλα / dimmer; Φωτισμός οργάνων / ταμπλό; Μπάρα φώτων; Φώτα στάθμευσης / ημέρας; Φως όπισθεν; Φλας; Φως εργασίας; Άλλο
cs: Funkce spínače světla: Přídavné/terénní světlo; Brzdové světlo (manuální/dodatečné); Nástupní / uvítací světlo; Stropní / vnitřní světlo; Jízdní světlo; Mlhové světlo; Výstražná světla; Přední světlomet; Dálkové světlo / tlumení; Osvětlení přístrojů/palubní desky; Světelná rampa; Parkovací/denní světla; Couvací světlo; Směrové světlo; Pracovní světlo; Jiné
pt-PT: Função do interruptor: Luz auxiliar/todo-o-terreno; Luz de travão (manual/pós-venda); Luz de presença/cortesia; Luz de tejadilho/interior; Luz de condução; Luz de nevoeiro; Luzes de emergência; Farol; Luzes de máximos/regulador de intensidade; Iluminação do painel de instrumentos; Barra de luz; Luzes de estacionamento/presença; Luz de marcha-atrás; Pisca; Luz de trabalho; Outro
es: Función del interruptor de luces: Luz auxiliar/todoterreno; Luz de freno (manual/mercado de accesorios); Luz de cortesía/luz de charco; Luz de techo/interior; Luz de conducción; Luz antiniebla; Luces de emergencia; Faro delantero; Luz alta/atenuador; Iluminación de instrumentos/tablero; Barra de luces; Luces de estacionamiento/marcha; Luz de marcha atrás/retroceso; Luz direccional; Luz de trabajo; Otro
tr: Işık anahtarı fonksiyonu: Yardımcı/arazi farı; Fren lambası (manuel/sonradan takılan); İç aydınlatma / kapı altı aydınlatması; Tavan lambası / iç aydınlatma; Sürüş farı; Sis farı; Dörtlü flaşör; Ön far; Uzun far / selektör; Gösterge / panel aydınlatması; Işık çubuğu; Park/gündüz farları; Geri vites lambası; Sinyal lambası; Çalışma lambası; Diğer
hr-HR: Functionsprekidača za svjetlo: Pomoćno / off-road svjetlo; Stop-svjetlo (ručno/naknadno ugrađeno); Pristupno svjetlo / svjetlo u vratima; Stropno / unutarnje svjetlo; Svjetlo za vožnju; Svjetlo za maglu; Svjetla upozorenja; Prednje svjetlo; Dugo svjetlo / prigušivač; Osvjetljenje instrumenata / armaturne ploče; Svjetlosna traka; Parkirna/pozicijska svjetla; Svjetlo za vožnju unatrag; Pokazivač smjera; Radno svjetlo; Ostalo
sv: Ljusströmbrytarens funktion: Extraljus/terrängbelysning; Bromsljus (manuell/eftermarknad); Instegs-/markbelysning; Tak-/interiörbelysning; Körljus; Dimljus; Varningsblinkers; Strålkastare; Helljus/dimmer; Instrument-/panelbelysning; Ljusramp; Parkeringsljus/varselljus; Backljus; Blinkers; Arbetsbelysning; Övrigt
ru: Функция выключателя света: Дополнительный/внедорожный свет; Стоп-сигнал (ручной/неоригинальный); Вежливая подсветка / подсветка зоны посадки; Плафон / внутреннее освещение; Ходовые огни; Противотуманные фары; Аварийная сигнализация; Фары; Дальний свет / переключатель света; Подсветка приборов / приборной панели; Световая балка; Габаритные/ходовые огни; Фонарь заднего хода; Указатель поворота; Рабочее освещение; Другое
nb: Lysbryterfunksjon: Ekstra- / terrenglys; Bremselys (manuelt/ettermarked); Innstigningslys / bakkelys; Kupé- / interiørlys; Kjørelys; Tåkelys; Varsellys; Hovedlys; Fjernlys / dimmer; Instrument- / dashbordbelysning; Lysbjelke; Parkeringslys / kjørelys; Ryggelys; Blinklys; Arbeidslys; Annet
ja: 照明スイッチのFunctions: 補助/オフロードライト; ブレーキライト (手動/後付け); カーテシ/パドルライト; ドーム/ルームランプ; ドライビングライト; フォグランプ; ハザードランプ; ヘッドライト; ハイビーム/ディマー; 計器/ダッシュボード照明; ライトバー; パーキングランプ/デイライト; バックランプ; ウィンカー; 作業灯; その他
nl: Lichtschakelaar functie: Extra / offroad-verlichting; Remlicht (handmatig/aftermarket); Instap- / sfeerverlichting; Plafond- / interieurverlichting; Rijverlichting; Mistlamp; Gevarenlichten; Koplamp; Grootlicht / dimmer; Instrumenten- / dashboardverlichting; Lichtbalk; Parkeer- / stadslichten; Achteruitrijlicht; Richtingaanwijzer; Werkverlichting; Overige
zh-TW: 燈光開關功能: 輔助/越野燈; 煞車燈 (手動/改裝); 迎賓燈 / 照地燈; 車頂燈 / 車內燈; 行車燈; 霧燈; 雙黃警示燈; 頭燈; 遠光燈 / 調光器; 儀表板 / 儀表照明; 燈條; 駐車燈/定位燈; 倒車燈; 方向燈; 工作燈; 其他
da: Lyskontaktens funktioner: Hjælpelys/offroadlys; Bremselys (manuelt/eftermarked); Indstigningslys/puddle light; Loftslys/indvendigt lys; Kørelys; Tågelygte; Havariblink; Forlygte; Fjernlys/nedblænding; Instrumentbelysning; Lysbro; Parkeringslys/kørelys; Baklys; Blinklys; Arbejdslys; Andet
ko: 조명 스위치 기능: 보조/오프로드 조명; 브레이크 조명(수동/애프터마켓); 커티시/퍼들 조명; 돔/실내 조명; 주행 조명; 안개등; 비상 경고등; 헤드라이트; 하이빔/디머; 계기판/대시보드 조명; 라이트 바; 주차등/주행등; 후진/백업 조명; 방향 지시등; 작업등; 기타
bg-BG: Функция на светлинния ключ: Допълнителни/офроуд светлини; Спирачна светлина (ръчна/афтърмаркет); Осветление за комфорт / светлини за локви; Плафониера / вътрешно осветление; Дневна светлина; Фар за мъгла; Аварийни светлини; Фар; Дълги светлини / димер; Осветление за уреди / табло; Лайтбар; Паркинг/габаритни светлини; Светлини за заден ход; Мигач; Работна светлина; Друго
lt-LT: Šviesos jungiklio funkcija: Pagalbinis / bekelės žibintas; Stabdžių žibintas (rankinis / neoriginalus); Įlipimo / balų apšvietimo žibintas; Salono / vidaus apšvietimo žibintas; Važiavimo žibintas; Rūko žibintas; Avarinis žibintas; Priekinis žibintas; Tolimosios šviesos / perjungiklis; Prietaisų skydelio apšvietimas; Šviesos juosta; Stovėjimo / gabaritiniai žibintai; Atbulinės eigos žibintas; Posūkio žibintas; Darbinis žibintas; Kita
sk-SK: Funkcia spínača svetiel: Prídavné/terénne svetlo; Brzdové svetlo (manuálne/dodatočné); Uvítacie/nástupné svetlo; Stropné/interiérové svetlo; Denné svietenie; Hmlové svetlo; Výstražné svetlo; Predný svetlomet; Diaľkové svetlo/stmievač; Osvetlenie prístrojov/palubnej dosky; Svetelná rampa; Parkovacie/obrysové svetlá; Svetlo spiatočky / cúvacie svetlo; Smerovka; Pracovné svetlo; Iné
it: Funzione dell'interruttore luci: Luce ausiliaria/fuoristrada; Luce freno (manuale/aftermarket); Luce di cortesia / pozzanghera; Luce di cortesia / interna; Luce di marcia; Fendinebbia; Luci di emergenza; Faro; Abbagliante / anabbagliante; Illuminazione strumenti / cruscotto; Barra luminosa; Luci di posizione/diurne; Luce di retromarcia; Indicatore di direzione; Luce di lavoro; Altro
zh-CN: 灯光开关功能: 辅助/越野灯; 刹车灯（手动/售后）; 迎宾灯/照地灯; 车顶灯/车内灯; 行车灯; 雾灯; 危险警告灯; 大灯; 远光灯/变光灯; 仪表盘/中控台照明; 长条灯; 驻车灯/日间行车灯; 倒车灯; 转向灯; 工作灯; 其他
fi: Valokytkimen toiminnot: Lisävalo / maastovalo; Jarruvalo (manuaalinen/jälkiasenteinen); Sisääntulovalo / lätäkkövalo; Kattovalo / sisävalo; Apuajovalo; Sumuvalo; Hätävilkku; Ajovalo; Kaukovalo / himmennin; Mittariston / kojelaudan valaistus; Valopaneeli; Pysäköintivalot / huomiovalot; Peruutusvalo; Suuntavilkku; Työvalo; Muu
hu: Világításkapcsoló működése: Kiegészítő/terepfényszóró; Féklámpa (kézi/utángyártott); Belső világítás / kilépőfény; Utastér- / belső világítás; Menetfény; Ködlámpa; Elakadásjelző; Fényszóró; Távolsági fényszóró / fényerőszabályzó; Műszerfal-világítás; Fényhíd; Helyzetjelző / nappali menetfény; Tolató-/hátsólámpa; Irányjelző; Munkalámpa; Egyéb